New York, session 2025-2026, S5313.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 16 to read as follows: 3 (16) (A) All policies providing coverage of dental services issued 4 pursuant to this section shall include the following disclosure: "IMPOR- 5 TANT: If you opt to receive services that are not covered services under 6 this plan, a participating provider may charge their normal fee for such 7 services. Prior to providing you with services that are not covered, a 8 provider will provide an estimated cost for each service." 9 (B) For purposes of this paragraph, "covered services" shall mean 10 dental services for which reimbursement is available under an insured's 11 dental plan or for which a reimbursement would be available but for the 12 application of contractual limitations such as deductibles, copayments, 13 coinsurance, waiting periods, annual or lifetime maximums, frequency 14 limitations, alternative benefit payments, or any other limitation. 15 § 2. Subsection (a) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 16 adding a new paragraph 18 to read as follows: 17 (18) (A) All policies providing coverage of dental services issued 18 pursuant to this section shall include the following disclosure: 19 "IMPORTANT: If you opt to receive services that are not covered services 20 under this plan, a participating provider may charge their normal fee 21 for such services. Prior to providing you with services that are not 22 covered, a provider will provide an estimated cost for each service." EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07721-05-5 S. 5313--A 2 1 (B) For the purposes of this paragraph, "covered services" shall mean 2 dental services for which reimbursement is available under an insured's 3 dental plan or for which a reimbursement would be available but for the 4 application of contractual limitations such as deductibles, copayments, 5 coinsurance, waiting periods, annual or lifetime maximums, frequency 6 limitations, alternative benefit payments, or any other limitation. 7 § 3. Subsection (s) of section 4303 of the insurance law, as added by 8 chapter 293 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 9 [(s)](s-1)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of a contract issued by a 10 medical expense indemnity corporation, a dental expense indemnity corpo- 11 ration or health service corporation, every contract which provides 12 coverage for care provided through licensed health professionals who can 13 bill for services shall provide the same coverage and reimbursement for 14 such service provided pursuant to a clinical practice plan established 15 pursuant to subdivision fourteen of section two hundred six of the 16 public health law. 17 (2) All contracts for dental services issued pursuant to this section 18 shall include the following disclosure: "IMPORTANT: If you opt to 19 receive services that are not covered services under this plan, a 20 participating provider may charge their normal fee for such services. 21 Prior to providing you with services that are not covered, a provider 22 will provide an estimated cost for each service." 23 (3) For purposes of this subsection, "covered services" shall mean 24 dental services for which reimbursement is available under an insured's 25 dental plan or for which a reimbursement would be available but for the 26 application of contractual limitations such as deductibles, copayments, 27 coinsurance, waiting periods, annual or lifetime maximums, frequency 28 limitations, alternative benefit payments, or any other limitation. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 30 insurance contracts issued or entered into on or after such date.